Maryland, session 2025, SB0489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
8–906.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER, POSSESS OR
CLAIM A RIGHT TO POSSESS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THE PERSON DOES NOT
LAWFULLY POSSESS OR OWN.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0489*

SENATE BILL 489
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90
DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS
AFTER THE PRECEDING VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR BOTH.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF:
(I) THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION OF THE RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN GRANTED POSSESSION UNDER A COURT ORDER; OR
(II) A REMEDY IS AVAILABLE UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN THE
POSSESSION OF ANOTHER ALLEGEDLY IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY SUBMIT A SWORN AFFIDAVIT TO THE SHERIFF FOR A COUNTY IN
WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED STATING THAT THE PERSON IS FRAUDULENTLY
IN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
SHERIFF SHALL REMOVE A PERSON IN POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY AFTER RECEIVING AN AFFIDAVIT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND RETURN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO THE OWNER.
(II) A DEPUTY SHERIFF MAY NOT REMOVE A PERSON IN
POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOLLOWING THE FILING OF AN
AFFIDAVIT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE PERSON IN
POSSESSION PRODUCES EVIDENCE OF LAWFUL POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY FROM FILING A SUIT UNDER § 14–132 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.